Utah statutes.
58-71-402.   Authority to assess penalty.

(1)  After proceeding pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, and Title 58, Chapter 1, Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing Act, the division may impose administrative penalties of up to $10,000 for acts of unprofessional conduct or unlawful conduct under this chapter.

(2)  Assessment of a penalty under this section does not affect any other action the division is authorized to take regarding a license issued under this chapter.

